Florida, session 2026, HB167.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (2) of
section 376.308, Florida Statutes, to read:
376.308 Liabilities and defenses of facilities.—
(2) In addition to the defense described in paragraph
(1)(c), the only other defenses of a person specified in
subsection (1) are to plead and prove that the occurrence was
solely the result of any of the following or any combination of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb167 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 167 2026 Legislature
the following:
(e) The condition giving rise to the cause of action is a
natural geological substance of a former phosphate mine, as
defined in s. 378.213, for which:
1. A notice has been recorded in accordance with s.
378.213(1); and
2. The Department of Health has conducted a survey under
s. 404.0561(1).
Section 2. Section 378.213, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
378.213 Notice of former phosphate mine site.—
(1) A landowner may record a notice in the official
records of the county in which the land is located which
identifies the landowner's property as a former phosphate mine.
The recorded notice must be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE
This property is a former phosphate mine as defined in
s. 378.213(2), Florida Statutes.

Such recording serves as notice that the land is a former
phosphate mine.
(2) As used in this section, the term "former phosphate
mine" means an area of land upon which phosphate mining has been
conducted and which may have been subject to a radiation survey
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb167 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 167 2026 Legislature
in accordance with s. 404.0561 and state reclamation
requirements of ss. 378.201-378.212, but does not include a
phosphogypsum stack as defined in s. 403.4154(1)(d).
Section 3. Section 404.0561, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
404.0561 Survey of former phosphate mining lands.—
(1) Upon petition by a current landowner, the department
shall conduct a gamma radiation survey of a former phosphate
land parcel within 120 days after receipt of the petition to
determine the radioactivity levels. The survey must document
gamma radiation exposure measurements and the locations of the
measurements.
(2) The department shall provide a copy of the preliminary
survey results to the petitioner within 30 days after completion
of the survey. Within 60 days after receipt of the survey, the
petitioner may request an additional survey based upon any
reasonable belief that the survey was flawed or not
representative of conditions on the site. The department shall
conduct one additional survey within 90 days after receipt of
the petitioner's request. The additional survey must meet the
requirements of this section and is deemed final within 90 days
after completion.
Section 4. Section 768.405, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
768.405 Documentation of radiation levels.—In any civil
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb167 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 167 2026 Legislature
action based on strict liability under s. 376.313(3), negligence
or similar conduct related to an alleged discharge of hazardous
substances or condition of pollution related to phosphate
mining, including the presence of mining overburden, solid waste
from the extraction, or beneficiation of phosphate rock from a
phosphate mine; or any other similar claim related to the mining
of phosphatic rock or reclamation of a mined area, the plaintiff
must include a radiation survey of the property with the
complaint. The survey must be prepared by a person certified as
either a health physicist by the American Board of Health
Physics or as a radiation protection technologist by the
National Registry of Radiation Protection Technologists. The
survey must be representative and document the measured gamma
radiation on the property, including background values
determined in accordance with the Environmental Protection
Agency's Multi-agency Radiation Survey and Site Investigation
Manual; the locations of the measurements; the testing
equipment; the testing methodology used, including the equipment
calibration date and protocol; and the name of the person
performing the survey and describe the person's relevant
training, education, and experience. The survey shall be
verified under penalty of perjury as provided in s. 92.525.
Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb167 -00-er